Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-705
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act shall be construed to limit the powers of the department provided in the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act.

Nothing in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act relating to the contamination of ground water is intended to limit the powers of the department provided in Chapter 81, article 15.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.20;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 261;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.04;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 203;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 26;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 206.

Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act, see section 71-5313.